Nevada, session 83, AB143.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. Chapter 631 of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto a new section to read as follows:
The Dentist and Dental Hygienist Compact is hereby ratified
and entered into with all other jurisdictions legally joining the
Compact, in substantially the form set forth in this section:

DENTIST AND DENTAL HYGIENIST COMPACT

SECTION 1. TITLE AND PURPOSE

This statute shall be known and cited as the Dentist and Dental
Hygienist Compact. The purposes of this Compact are to facilitate
the interstate practice of dentistry and dental hygiene and improve
public access to dentistry and dental hygiene services by providing
Dentists and Dental Hygienists licensed in a Participating State
the ability to practice in Participating States in which they are not
licensed. The Compact does this by establishing a pathway for
Dentists and Dental Hygienists licensed in a Participating State to
obtain a Compact Privilege that authorizes them to practice in
another Participating State in which they are not licensed. The
Compact enables Participating States to protect the public health
and safety with respect to the practice of such Dentists and Dental
Hygienists, through the State’s authority to regulate the practice
of dentistry and dental hygiene in the State. The Compact:
-
*AB143*

– 3 –
A. Enables Dentists and Dental Hygienists who qualify for a
Compact Privilege to practice in other Participating States without
satisfying burdensome and duplicative requirements associated
with securing a License to practice in those States;
B. Promotes mobility and addresses workforce shortages
through each Participating State’s acceptance of a Compact
Privilege to practice in that State;
C. Increases public access to qualified, licensed Dentists and
Dental Hygienists by creating a responsible, streamlined pathway
for Licensees to practice in Participating States;
D. Enhances the ability of Participating States to protect the
public’s health and safety;
E. Does not interfere with licensure requirements established
by a Participating State;
F. Facilitates the sharing of licensure and disciplinary
information among Participating States;
G. Requires Dentists and Dental Hygienists who practice in a
Participating State pursuant to a Compact Privilege to practice
within the Scope of Practice authorized in that State;
H. Extends the authority of a Participating State to regulate
the practice of dentistry and dental hygiene within its borders to
Dentists and Dental Hygienists who practice in the State through a
Compact Privilege;
I. Promotes the cooperation of Participating States in
regulating the practice of dentistry and dental hygiene within
those States; and
J. Facilitates the relocation of military members and their
spouses who are licensed to practice dentistry or dental hygiene.

SECTION 2. DEFINITIONS

As used in this Compact, unless the context requires otherwise,
the following definitions shall apply:
A. “Active Military Member” means any person with full-
time duty status in the armed forces of the United States, including
members of the National Guard and Reserve.
B. “Adverse Action” means disciplinary action or
encumbrance imposed on a License or Compact Privilege by a
State Licensing Authority.
C. “Alternative Program” means a non-disciplinary
monitoring or practice remediation process applicable to a Dentist
or Dental Hygienist approved by a State Licensing Authority of a
Participating State in which the Dentist or Dental Hygienist is
licensed. This includes, but is not limited to, programs to which
-
*AB143*

– 4 –
Licensees with substance abuse or addiction issues are referred in
lieu of Adverse Action.
D. “Clinical Assessment” means examination or process,
required for licensure as a Dentist or Dental Hygienist, as
applicable, that provides evidence of clinical competence in
dentistry or dental hygiene.
E. “Commissioner” means the individual appointed by a
Participating State to serve as the member of the Commission for
that Participating State.
F. “Compact” means this Dentist and Dental Hygienist
Compact.
G. “Compact Privilege” means the authorization granted by a
Remote State to allow a Licensee from a Participating State to
practice as a Dentist or Dental Hygienist in a Remote State.
H. “Continuing Professional Development” means a
requirement, as a condition of License renewal to provide evidence
of successful participation in educational or professional activities
relevant to practice or area of work.
I. “Criminal Background Check” means the submission of
fingerprints or other biometric-based information for a License
applicant for the purpose of obtaining that applicant’s criminal
history record information, as defined in 28 C.F.R. § 20.3(d) from
the Federal Bureau of Investigation and the State’s criminal
history record repository as defined in 28 C.F.R. § 20.3(f).
J. “Data System” means the Commission’s repository of
information about Licensees, including, but not limited to,
examination, licensure, investigative, Compact Privilege, Adverse
Action, and Alternative Program.
K. “Dental Hygienist” means an individual who is licensed by
a State Licensing Authority to practice dental hygiene.
L. “Dentist” means an individual who is licensed by a State
Licensing Authority to practice dentistry.
M. “Dentist and Dental Hygienist Compact Commission” or
“Commission” means a joint government agency established by
this Compact comprised of each State that has enacted the
Compact and a national administrative body comprised of a
Commissioner from each State that has enacted the Compact.
N. “Encumbered License” means a License that a State
Licensing Authority has limited in any way other than through an
Alternative Program.
O. “Executive Board” means the Chair, Vice Chair,
Secretary and Treasurer and any other Commissioners as may be
determined by Commission Rule or bylaw.
-
*AB143*

– 5 –
P. “Jurisprudence Requirement” means the assessment of an
individual’s knowledge of the laws and Rules governing the
practice of dentistry or dental hygiene, as applicable, in a State.
Q. “License” means current authorization by a State, other
than authorization pursuant to a Compact Privilege, or other
privilege, for an individual to practice as a Dentist or Dental
Hygienist in that State.
R. “Licensee” means an individual who holds an unrestricted
License from a Participating State to practice as a Dentist or
Dental Hygienist in that State.
S. “Model Compact” means the model for the Dentist and
Dental Hygienist Compact on file with the Council of State
Governments or other entity as designated by the Commission.
T. “Participating State” means a State that has enacted the
Compact and been admitted to the Commission in accordance with
the provisions herein and Commission Rules.
U. “Qualifying License” means a License that is not an
Encumbered License issued by a Participating State to practice
dentistry or dental hygiene.
V. “Remote State” means a Participating State where a
Licensee who is not licensed as a Dentist or Dental Hygienist is
exercising or seeking to exercise the Compact Privilege.
W. “Rule” means a regulation promulgated by an entity that
has the force of law.
X. “Scope of Practice” means the procedures, actions, and
processes a Dentist or Dental Hygienist licensed in a State is
permitted to undertake in that State and the circumstances under
which the Licensee is permitted to undertake those procedures,
actions and processes. Such procedures, actions and processes and
the circumstances under which they may be undertaken may be
established through means, including, but not limited to, statute,
regulations, case law, and other processes available to the State
Licensing Authority or other government agency.
Y. “Significant Investigative Information” means
information, records, and documents received or generated by a
State Licensing Authority pursuant to an investigation for which a
determination has been made that there is probable cause to
believe that the Licensee has violated a statute or regulation that is
considered more than a minor infraction for which the State
Licensing Authority could pursue Adverse Action against the
Licensee.
Z. “State” means any state, commonwealth, district, or
territory of the United States of America that regulates the
practices of dentistry and dental hygiene.
-
*AB143*

– 6 –
AA. “State Licensing Authority” means an agency or other
entity of a State that is responsible for the licensing and regulation
of Dentists or Dental Hygienists.

SECTION 3. STATE PARTICIPATION IN THE COMPACT

A. In order to join the Compact and thereafter continue as a
Participating State, a State must:
1. Enact a compact that is not materially different from the
Model Compact as determined in accordance with Commission
Rules;
2. Participate fully in the Commission’s Data System;
3. Have a mechanism in place for receiving and
investigating complaints about its Licensees and License
applicants;
4. Notify the Commission, in compliance with the terms of
the Compact and Commission Rules, of any Adverse Action or the
availability of Significant Investigative Information regarding a
Licensee and License applicant;
5. Fully implement a Criminal Background Check
requirement, within a time frame established by Commission Rule,
by receiving the results of a qualifying Criminal Background
Check;
6. Comply with the Commission Rules applicable to a
Participating State;
7. Accept the National Board Examinations of the Joint
Commission on National Dental Examinations or another
examination accepted by Commission Rule as a licensure
examination;
8. Accept for licensure that applicants for a Dentist License
graduate from a predoctoral dental education program accredited
by the Commission on Dental Accreditation, or another
accrediting agency recognized by the United States Department of
Education for the accreditation of dentistry and dental hygiene
education programs, leading to the Doctor of Dental Surgery
(D.D.S.) or Doctor of Dental Medicine (D.M.D.) degree;
9. Accept for licensure that applicants for a Dental
Hygienist License graduate from a dental hygiene education
program accredited by the Commission on Dental Accreditation or
another accrediting agency recognized by the United States
Department of Education for the accreditation of dentistry and
dental hygiene education programs;
10. Require for licensure that applicants successfully
complete a Clinical Assessment;
-
*AB143*

– 7 –
11. Have Continuing Professional Development
requirements as a condition for License renewal; and
12. Pay a participation fee to the Commission as
established by Commission Rule.
B. Providing alternative pathways for an individual to obtain
an unrestricted License does not disqualify a State from
participating in the Compact.
C. When conducting a Criminal Background Check, the
State Licensing Authority shall:
1. Consider that information in making a licensure
decision;
2. Maintain documentation of completion of the Criminal
Background Check and background check information to the
extent allowed by State and federal law; and
3. Report to the Commission whether it has completed the
Criminal Background Check and whether the individual was
granted or denied a License.
D. A Licensee of a Participating State who has a Qualifying
License in that State and does not hold an Encumbered License in
any other Participating State, shall be issued a Compact Privilege
in a Remote State in accordance with the terms of the Compact
and Commission Rules. If a Remote State has a Jurisprudence
Requirement a Compact Privilege will not be issued to the
Licensee unless the Licensee has satisfied the Jurisprudence
Requirement.

SECTION 4. COMPACT PRIVILEGE

A. To obtain and exercise the Compact Privilege under the
terms and provisions of the Compact, the Licensee shall:
1. Have a Qualifying License as a Dentist or Dental
Hygienist in a Participating State;
2. Be eligible for a Compact Privilege in any Remote State
in accordance with D, G and H of this section;
3. Submit to an application process whenever the Licensee
is seeking a Compact Privilege;
4. Pay any applicable Commission and Remote State fees
for a Compact Privilege in the Remote State;
5. Meet any Jurisprudence Requirement established by a
Remote State in which the Licensee is seeking a Compact
Privilege;
6. Have passed a National Board Examination of the Joint
Commission on National Dental Examinations or another
examination accepted by Commission Rule;
-
*AB143*

– 8 –
7. For a Dentist, have graduated from a predoctoral dental
education program accredited by the Commission on Dental
Accreditation, or another accrediting agency recognized by the
United States Department of Education for the accreditation of
dentistry and dental hygiene education programs, leading to the
Doctor of Dental Surgery (D.D.S.) or Doctor of Dental Medicine
(D.M.D.) degree;
8. For a Dental Hygienist, have graduated from a dental
hygiene education program accredited by the Commission on
Dental Accreditation or another accrediting agency recognized by
the United States Department of Education for the accreditation of
dentistry and dental hygiene education programs;
9. Have successfully completed a Clinical Assessment for
licensure;
10. Report to the Commission Adverse Action taken by any
non-Participating State when applying for a Compact Privilege
and, otherwise, within thirty (30) days from the date the Adverse
Action is taken;
11. Report to the Commission when applying for a Compact
Privilege the address of the Licensee’s primary residence and
thereafter immediately report to the Commission any change in
the address of the Licensee’s primary residence; and
12. Consent to accept service of process by mail at the
Licensee’s primary residence on record with the Commission with
respect to any action brought against the Licensee by the
Commission or a Participating State, and consent to accept service
of a subpoena by mail at the Licensee’s primary residence on
record with the Commission with respect to any action brought or
investigation conducted by the Commission or a Participating
State.
B. The Licensee must comply with the requirements of
subsection A of this section to maintain the Compact Privilege in
the Remote State. If those requirements are met, the Compact
Privilege will continue as long as the Licensee maintains a
Qualifying License in the State through which the Licensee
applied for the Compact Privilege and pays any applicable
Compact Privilege renewal fees.
C. A Licensee providing dentistry or dental hygiene in a
Remote State under the Compact Privilege shall function within
the Scope of Practice authorized by the Remote State for a Dentist
or Dental Hygienist licensed in that State.
D. A Licensee providing dentistry or dental hygiene pursuant
to a Compact Privilege in a Remote State is subject to that State’s
regulatory authority. A Remote State may, in accordance with due
process and that State’s laws, by Adverse Action revoke or remove
-
*AB143*

– 9 –
a Licensee’s Compact Privilege in the Remote State for a specific
period of time and impose fines or take any other necessary
actions to protect the health and safety of its citizens. If a Remote
State imposes an Adverse Action against a Compact Privilege that
limits the Compact Privilege, that Adverse Action applies to all
Compact Privileges in all Remote States. A Licensee whose
Compact Privilege in a Remote State is removed for a specified
period of time is not eligible for a Compact Privilege in any other
Remote State until the specific time for removal of the Compact
Privilege has passed and all encumbrance requirements are
satisfied.
E. If a License in a Participating State is an Encumbered
License, the Licensee shall lose the Compact Privilege in a Remote
State and shall not be eligible for a Compact Privilege in any
Remote State until the License is no longer encumbered.
F. Once an Encumbered License in a Participating State is
restored to good standing, the Licensee must meet the
requirements of subsection A of this section to obtain a Compact
Privilege in a Remote State.
G. If a Licensee’s Compact Privilege in a Remote State is
removed by the Remote State, the individual shall lose or be
ineligible for the Compact Privilege in any Remote State until the
following occur:
1. The specific period of time for which the Compact
Privilege was removed has ended; and
2. All conditions for removal of the Compact Privilege have
been satisfied.
H. Once the requirements of subsection G of this section
have been met, the Licensee must meet the requirements in
subsection A of this section to obtain a Compact Privilege in a
Remote State.

SECTION 5. ACTIVE MILITARY MEMBERS OR THEIR
SPOUSES

An Active Military Member and their spouse shall not be
required to pay to the Commission for a Compact Privilege the fee
otherwise charged by the Commission. If a Remote State chooses
to charge a fee for a Compact Privilege, it may choose to charge a
reduced fee or no fee to an Active Military Member and their
spouse for a Compact Privilege.
-
*AB143*

– 10 –
SECTION 6. ADVERSE ACTIONS

A. A Participating State in which a Licensee is licensed shall
have exclusive authority to impose Adverse Action against the
Qualifying License issued by that Participating State.
B. A Participating State may take Adverse Action based on
the Significant Investigative Information of a Remote State, so
long as the Participating State follows its own procedures for
imposing Adverse Action.
C. Nothing in this Compact shall override a Participating
State’s decision that participation in an Alternative Program may
be used in lieu of Adverse Action and that such participation shall
remain non-public if required by the Participating State’s laws.
Participating States must require Licensees who enter any
Alternative Program in lieu of discipline to agree not to practice
pursuant to a Compact Privilege in any other Participating State
during the term of the Alternative Program without prior
authorization from such other Participating State.
D. Any Participating State in which a Licensee is applying to
practice or is practicing pursuant to a Compact Privilege may
investigate actual or alleged violations of the statutes and
regulations authorizing the practice of dentistry or dental hygiene
in any other Participating State in which the Dentist or Dental
Hygienist holds a License or Compact Privilege.
E. A Remote State shall have the authority to:
1. Take Adverse Actions as set forth in Section 4.D against
a Licensee’s Compact Privilege in the State;
2. In furtherance of its rights and responsibilities under the
Compact and the Commission’s Rules issue subpoenas for both
hearings and investigations that require the attendance and
testimony of witnesses, and the production of evidence. Subpoenas
issued by a State Licensing Authority in a Participating State for
the attendance and testimony of witnesses, or the production of
evidence from another Participating State, shall be enforced in the
latter State by any court of competent jurisdiction, according to
the practice and procedure of that court applicable to subpoenas
issued in proceedings pending before it. The issuing authority
shall pay any witness fees, travel expenses, mileage, and other fees
required by the service statutes of the State where the witnesses or
evidence are located; and
3. If otherwise permitted by State law, recover from the
Licensee the costs of investigations and disposition of cases
resulting from any Adverse Action taken against that Licensee.
F. Joint Investigations
-
*AB143*

– 11 –
1. In addition to the authority granted to a Participating
State by its Dentist or Dental Hygienist licensure act or other
applicable State law, a Participating State may jointly investigate
Licensees with other Participating States.
2. Participating States shall share any Significant
Investigative Information, litigation, or compliance materials in
furtherance of any joint or individual investigation initiated under
the Compact.
G. Authority to Continue Investigation
1. After a Licensee’s Compact Privilege in a Remote State
is terminated, the Remote State may continue an investigation of
the Licensee that began when the Licensee had a Compact
Privilege in that Remote State.
2. If the investigation yields what would be Significant
Investigative Information had the Licensee continued to have a
Compact Privilege in that Remote State, the Remote State shall
report the presence of such information to the Data System as
required by Section 8.B.6 as if it was Significant Investigative
Information.

SECTION 7. ESTABLISHMENT AND OPERATION OF THE
COMMISSION

A. The Compact Participating States hereby create and
establish a joint government agency whose membership consists of
all Participating States that have enacted the Compact. The
Commission is an instrumentality of the Participating States
acting jointly and not an instrumentality of any one State. The
Commission shall come into existence on or after the effective date
of the Compact as set forth in Section 11A.
B. Participation, Voting, and Meetings
1. Each Participating State shall have and be limited to one
(1) Commissioner selected by that Participating State’s State
Licensing Authority or, if the State has more than one State
Licensing Authority, selected collectively by the State Licensing
Authorities.
2. The Commissioner shall be a member or designee of
such Authority or Authorities.
3. The Commission may by Rule or bylaw establish a term
of office for Commissioners and may by Rule or bylaw establish
term limits.
4. The Commission may recommend to a State Licensing
Authority or Authorities, as applicable, removal or suspension of
an individual as the State’s Commissioner.
-
*AB143*

– 12 –
5. A Participating State’s State Licensing Authority, or
Authorities, as applicable, shall fill any vacancy of its
Commissioner on the Commission within sixty (60) days of the
vacancy.
6. Each Commissioner shall be entitled to one vote on all
matters that are voted upon by the Commission.
7. The Commission shall meet at least once during each
calendar year. Additional meetings may be held as set forth in the
bylaws. The Commission may meet by telecommunication, video
conference or other similar electronic means.
C. The Commission shall have the following powers:
1. Establish the fiscal year of the Commission;
2. Establish a code of conduct and conflict of interest
policies;
3. Adopt Rules and bylaws;
4. Maintain its financial records in accordance with the
bylaws;
5. Meet and take such actions as are consistent with the
provisions of this Compact, the Commission’s Rules, and the
bylaws;
6. Initiate and conclude legal proceedings or actions in the
name of the Commission, provided that the standing of any State
Licensing Authority to sue or be sued under applicable law shall
not be affected;
7. Maintain and certify records and information provided to
a Participating State as the authenticated business records of the
Commission, and designate a person to do so on the Commission’s
behalf;
8. Purchase and maintain insurance and bonds;
9. Borrow, accept, or contract for services of personnel,
including, but not limited to, employees of a Participating State;
10. Conduct an annual financial review;
11. Hire employees, elect or appoint officers, fix
compensation, define duties, grant such individuals appropriate
authority to carry out the purposes of the Compact, and establish
the Commission’s personnel policies and programs relating to
conflicts of interest, qualifications of personnel, and other related
personnel matters;
12. As set forth in the Commission Rules, charge a fee to a
Licensee for the grant of a Compact Privilege in a Remote State
and thereafter, as may be established by Commission Rule, charge
the Licensee a Compact Privilege renewal fee for each renewal
period in which that Licensee exercises or intends to exercise the
Compact Privilege in that Remote State. Nothing herein shall be
construed to prevent a Remote State from charging a Licensee a
-
*AB143*

– 13 –
fee for a Compact Privilege or renewals of a Compact Privilege, or
a fee for the Jurisprudence Requirement if the Remote State
imposes such a requirement for the grant of a Compact Privilege;
13. Accept any and all appropriate gifts, donations, grants
of money, other sources of revenue, equipment, supplies,
materials, and services, and receive, utilize, and dispose of the
same; provided that at all times the Commission shall avoid any
appearance of impropriety and/or conflict of interest;
14. Lease, purchase, retain, own, hold, improve, or use any
property, real, personal, or mixed, or any undivided interest
therein;
15. Sell, convey, mortgage, pledge, lease, exchange,
abandon, or otherwise dispose of any property real, personal, or
mixed;
16. Establish a budget and make expenditures;
17. Borrow money;
18. Appoint committees, including standing committees,
which may be composed of members, State regulators, State
legislators or their representatives, and consumer representatives,
and such other interested persons as may be designated in this
Compact and the bylaws;
19. Provide and receive information from, and cooperate
with, law enforcement agencies;
20. Elect a Chair, Vice Chair, Secretary and Treasurer and
such other officers of the Commission as provided in the
Commission’s bylaws;
21. Establish and elect an Executive Board;
22. Adopt and provide to the Participating States an annual
report;
23. Determine whether a State’s enacted compact is
materially different from the Model Compact language such that
the State would not qualify for participation in the Compact; and
24. Perform such other functions as may be necessary or
appropriate to achieve the purposes of this Compact.
D. Meetings of the Commission
1. All meetings of the Commission that are not closed
pursuant to this subsection shall be open to the public. Notice of
public meetings shall be posted on the Commission’s website at
least thirty (30) days prior to the public meeting.
2. Notwithstanding subsection D.1 of this section, the
Commission may convene an emergency public meeting by
providing at least twenty-four (24) hours prior notice on the
Commission’s website, and any other means as provided in the
Commission’s Rules, for any of the reasons it may dispense with
notice of proposed rulemaking under Section 9.L. The
-
*AB143*

– 14 –
Commission’s legal counsel shall certify that one of the reasons
justifying an emergency public meeting has been met.
3. Notice of all Commission meetings shall provide the
time, date, and location of the meeting, and if the meeting is to be
held or accessible via telecommunication, video conference, or
other electronic means, the notice shall include the mechanism for
access to the meeting through such means.
4. The Commission may convene in a closed, non-public
meeting for the Commission to receive legal advice or to discuss:
a. Non-compliance of a Participating State with its
obligations under the Compact;
b. The employment, compensation, discipline or other
matters, practices or procedures related to specific employees or
other matters related to the Commission’s internal personnel
practices and procedures;
c. Current or threatened discipline of a Licensee or
Compact Privilege holder by the Commission or by a Participating
State’s Licensing Authority;
d. Current, threatened, or reasonably anticipated
litigation;
e. Negotiation of contracts for the purchase, lease, or
sale of goods, services, or real estate;
f. Accusing any person of a crime or formally censuring
any person;
g. Trade secrets or commercial or financial information
that is privileged or confidential;
h. Information of a personal nature where disclosure
would constitute a clearly unwarranted invasion of personal
privacy;
i. Investigative records compiled for law enforcement
purposes;
j. Information related to any investigative reports
prepared by or on behalf of or for use of the Commission or other
committee charged with responsibility of investigation or
determination of compliance issues pursuant to the Compact;
k. Legal advice;
l. Matters specifically exempted from disclosure to the
public by federal or Participating State law; and
m. Other matters as promulgated by the Commission by
Rule.
5. If a meeting, or portion of a meeting, is closed, the
presiding officer shall state that the meeting will be closed and
reference each relevant exempting provision, and such reference
shall be recorded in the minutes.
-
*AB143*

– 15 –
6. The Commission shall keep minutes that fully and
clearly describe all matters discussed in a meeting and shall
provide a full and accurate summary of actions taken, and the
reasons therefore, including a description of the views expressed.
All documents considered in connection with an action shall be
identified in such minutes. All minutes and documents of a closed
meeting shall remain under seal, subject to release only by a
majority vote of the Commission or order of a court of competent
jurisdiction.
E. Financing of the Commission
1. The Commission shall pay, or provide for the payment
of, the reasonable expenses of its establishment, organization, and
ongoing activities.
2. The Commission may accept any and all appropriate
sources of revenue, donations, and grants of money, equipment,
supplies, materials, and services.
3. The Commission may levy on and collect an annual
assessment from each Participating State and impose fees on
Licensees of Participating States when a Compact Privilege is
granted, to cover the cost of the operations and activities of the
Commission and its staff, which must be in a total amount
sufficient to cover its annual budget as approved each fiscal year
for which sufficient revenue is not provided by other sources. The
aggregate annual assessment amount for Participating States
shall be allocated based upon a formula that the Commission shall
promulgate by Rule.
4. The Commission shall not incur obligations of any kind
prior to securing the funds adequate to meet the same; nor shall
the Commission pledge the credit of any Participating State,
except by and with the authority of the Participating State.
5. The Commission shall keep accurate accounts of all
receipts and disbursements. The receipts and disbursements of the
Commission shall be subject to the financial review and
accounting procedures established under its bylaws. All receipts
and disbursements of funds handled by the Commission shall be
subject to an annual financial review by a certified or licensed
public accountant, and the report of the financial review shall be
included in and become part of the annual report of the
Commission.
F. The Executive Board
1. The Executive Board shall have the power to act on
behalf of the Commission according to the terms of this Compact.
The powers, duties, and responsibilities of the Executive Board
shall include:
-
*AB143*

– 16 –
a. Overseeing the day-to-day activities of the
administration of the Compact including compliance with the
provisions of the Compact, the Commission’s Rules and bylaws;
b. Recommending to the Commission changes to the
Rules or bylaws, changes to this Compact legislation, fees charged
to Compact Participating States, fees charged to Licensees, and
other fees;
c. Ensuring Compact administration services are
appropriately provided, including by contract;
d. Preparing and recommending the budget;
e. Maintaining financial records on behalf of the
Commission;
f. Monitoring Compact compliance of Participating
States and providing compliance reports to the Commission;
g. Establishing additional committees as necessary;
h. Exercising the powers and duties of the Commission
during the interim between Commission meetings, except for
adopting or amending Rules, adopting or amending bylaws, and
exercising any other powers and duties expressly reserved to the
Commission by Rule or bylaw; and
i. Other duties as provided in the Rules or bylaws of the
Commission.
2. The Executive Board shall be composed of up to seven
(7) members:
a. The Chair, Vice Chair, Secretary and Treasurer of
the Commission and any other members of the Commission who
serve on the Executive Board shall be voting members of the
Executive Board; and
b. Other than the Chair, Vice Chair, Secretary, and
Treasurer, the Commission may elect up to three (3) voting
members from the current membership of the Commission.
3. The Commission may remove any member of the
Executive Board as provided in the Commission’s bylaws.
4. The Executive Board shall meet at least annually.
a. An Executive Board meeting at which it takes or
intends to take formal action on a matter shall be open to the
public, except that the Executive Board may meet in a closed, non-
public session of a public meeting when dealing with any of the
matters covered under subsection D.4 of this section.
b. The Executive Board shall give five (5) business days’
notice of its public meetings, posted on its website and as it may
otherwise determine to provide notice to persons with an interest
in the public matters the Executive Board intends to address at
those meetings.
-
*AB143*

– 17 –
5. The Executive Board may hold an emergency meeting
when acting for the Commission to:
a. Meet an imminent threat to public health, safety, or
welfare;
b. Prevent a loss of Commission or Participating State
funds; or
c. Protect public health and safety.
G. Qualified Immunity, Defense, and Indemnification
1. The members, officers, executive director, employees and
representatives of the Commission shall be immune from suit and
liability, both personally and in their official capacity, for any
claim for damage to or loss of property or personal injury or other
civil liability caused by or arising out of any actual or alleged act,
error, or omission that occurred, or that the person against whom
the claim is made had a reasonable basis for believing occurred
within the scope of Commission employment, duties or
responsibilities; provided that nothing in this paragraph shall be
construed to protect any such person from suit or liability for any
damage, loss, injury, or liability caused by the intentional or
willful or wanton misconduct of that person. The procurement of
insurance of any type by the Commission shall not in any way
compromise or limit the immunity granted hereunder.
2. The Commission shall defend any member, officer,
executive director, employee, and representative of the
Commission in any civil action seeking to impose liability arising
out of any actual or alleged act, error, or omission that occurred
within the scope of Commission employment, duties, or
responsibilities, or as determined by the Commission that the
person against whom the claim is made had a reasonable basis for
believing occurred within the scope of Commission employment,
duties, or responsibilities; provided that nothing herein shall be
construed to prohibit that person from retaining their own counsel
at their own expense; and provided further, that the actual or
alleged act, error, or omission did not result from that person’s
intentional or willful or wanton misconduct.
3. Notwithstanding subsection G.1 of this section, should
any member, officer, executive director, employee, or
representative of the Commission be held liable for the amount of
any settlement or judgment arising out of any actual or alleged
act, error, or omission that occurred within the scope of that
individual’s employment, duties, or responsibilities for the
Commission, or that the person to whom that individual is liable
had a reasonable basis for believing occurred within the scope of
the individual’s employment, duties, or responsibilities for the
Commission, the Commission shall indemnify and hold harmless
-
*AB143*

– 18 –
such individual, provided that the actual or alleged act, error, or
omission did not result from the intentional or willful or wanton
misconduct of the individual.
4. Nothing herein shall be construed as a limitation on the
liability of any Licensee for professional malpractice or
misconduct, which shall be governed solely by any other
applicable State laws.
5. Nothing in this Compact shall be interpreted to waive or
otherwise abrogate a Participating State’s state action immunity or
state action affirmative defense with respect to antitrust claims
under the Sherman Act, Clayton Act, or any other State or federal
antitrust or anticompetitive law or regulation.
6. Nothing in this Compact shall be construed to be a
waiver of sovereign immunity by the Participating States or by the
Commission.

SECTION 8. DATA SYSTEM

A. The Commission shall provide for the development,
maintenance, operation, and utilization of a coordinated database
and reporting system containing licensure, Adverse Action, and
the presence of Significant Investigative Information on all
Licensees and applicants for a License in Participating States.
B. Notwithstanding any other provision of State law to the
contrary, a Participating State shall submit a uniform data set to
the Data System on all individuals to whom this Compact is
applicable as required by the Rules of the Commission, including:
1. Identifying information;
2. Licensure data;
3. Adverse Actions against a Licensee, License applicant or
Compact Privilege and information related thereto;
4. Non-confidential information related to Alternative
Program participation, the beginning and ending dates of such
participation, and other information related to such participation;
5. Any denial of an application for licensure, and the
reason(s) for such denial, (excluding the reporting of any criminal
history record information where prohibited by law);
6. The presence of Significant Investigative Information;
and
7. Other information that may facilitate the administration
of this Compact or the protection of the public, as determined by
the Rules of the Commission.
C. The records and information provided to a Participating
State pursuant to this Compact or through the Data System, when
certified by the Commission or an agent thereof, shall constitute
-
*AB143*

– 19 –
the authenticated business records of the Commission, and shall
be entitled to any associated hearsay exception in any relevant
judicial, quasi-judicial or administrative proceedings in a
Participating State.
D. Significant Investigative Information pertaining to a
Licensee in any Participating State will only be available to other
Participating States.
E. It is the responsibility of the Participating States to
monitor the database to determine whether Adverse Action has
been taken against a Licensee or License applicant. Adverse
Action information pertaining to a Licensee or License applicant
in any Participating State will be available to any other
Participating State.
F. Participating States contributing information to the Data
System may designate information that may not be shared with the
public without the express permission of the contributing State.
G. Any information submitted to the Data System that is
subsequently expunged pursuant to federal law or the laws of the
Participating State contributing the information shall be removed
from the Data System.

SECTION 9. RULEMAKING

A. The Commission shall promulgate reasonable Rules in
order to effectively and efficiently implement and administer the
purposes and provisions of the Compact. A Commission Rule shall
be invalid and have no force or effect only if a court of competent
jurisdiction holds that the Rule is invalid because the Commission
exercised its rulemaking authority in a manner that is beyond the
scope and purposes of the Compact, or the powers granted
hereunder, or based upon another applicable standard of review.
B. The Rules of the Commission shall have the force of law
in each Participating State, provided however that where the Rules
of the Commission conflict with the laws of the Participating State
that establish the Participating State’s Scope of Practice as held by
a court of competent jurisdiction, the Rules of the Commission
shall be ineffective in that State to the extent of the conflict.
C. The Commission shall exercise its Rulemaking powers
pursuant to the criteria set forth in this section and the Rules
adopted thereunder. Rules shall become binding as of the date
specified by the Commission for each Rule.
D. If a majority of the legislatures of the Participating States
rejects a Commission Rule or portion of a Commission Rule, by
enactment of a statute or resolution in the same manner used to
adopt the Compact, within four (4) years of the date of adoption of
-
*AB143*

– 20 –
the Rule, then such Rule shall have no further force and effect in
any Participating State or to any State applying to participate in
the Compact.
E. Rules shall be adopted at a regular or special meeting of
the Commission.
F. Prior to adoption of a proposed Rule, the Commission
shall hold a public hearing and allow persons to provide oral and
written comments, data, facts, opinions, and arguments.
G. Prior to adoption of a proposed Rule by the Commission,
and at least thirty (30) days in advance of the meeting at which the
Commission will hold a public hearing on the proposed Rule, the
Commission shall provide a Notice of Proposed Rulemaking:
1. On the website of the Commission or other publicly
accessible platform;
2. To persons who have requested notice of the
Commission’s notices of proposed rulemaking, and
3. In such other way(s) as the Commission may by Rule
specify.
H. The Notice of Proposed Rulemaking shall include:
1. The time, date, and location of the public hearing at
which the Commission will hear public comments on the proposed
Rule and, if different, the time, date, and location of the meeting
where the Commission will consider and vote on the proposed
Rule;
2. If the hearing is held via telecommunication, video
conference, or other electronic means, the Commission shall
include the mechanism for access to the hearing in the Notice of
Proposed Rulemaking;
3. The text of the proposed Rule and the reason therefor;
4. A request for comments on the proposed Rule from any
interested person; and
5. The manner in which interested persons may submit
written comments.
I. All hearings will be recorded. A copy of the recording and
all written comments and documents received by the Commission
in response to the proposed Rule shall be available to the public.
J. Nothing in this section shall be construed as requiring a
separate hearing on each Commission Rule. Rules may be
grouped for the convenience of the Commission at hearings
required by this section.
K. The Commission shall, by majority vote of all
Commissioners, take final action on the proposed Rule based on
the rulemaking record.
-
*AB143*

– 21 –
1. The Commission may adopt changes to the proposed
Rule provided the changes do not enlarge the original purpose of
the proposed Rule.
2. The Commission shall provide an explanation of the
reasons for substantive changes made to the proposed Rule as well
as reasons for substantive changes not made that were
recommended by commenters.
3. The Commission shall determine a reasonable effective
date for the Rule. Except for an emergency as provided in
subsection L of this section, the effective date of the Rule shall be
no sooner than thirty (30) days after the Commission issuing the
notice that it adopted or amended the Rule.
L. Upon determination that an emergency exists, the
Commission may consider and adopt an emergency Rule with 24
hours’ notice, with opportunity to comment, provided that the
usual rulemaking procedures provided in the Compact and in this
section shall be retroactively applied to the Rule as soon as
reasonably possible, in no event later than ninety (90) days after
the effective date of the Rule. For the purposes of this provision,
an emergency Rule is one that must be adopted immediately in
order to:
1. Meet an imminent threat to public health, safety, or
welfare;
2. Prevent a loss of Commission or Participating State
funds;
3. Meet a deadline for the promulgation of a Rule that is
established by federal law or rule; or
4. Protect public health and safety.
M. The Commission or an authorized committee of the
Commission may direct revisions to a previously adopted Rule for
purposes of correcting typographical errors, errors in format,
errors in consistency, or grammatical errors. Public notice of any
revisions shall be posted on the website of the Commission. The
revision shall be subject to challenge by any person for a period of
thirty (30) days after posting. The revision may be challenged only
on grounds that the revision results in a material change to a
Rule. A challenge shall be made in writing and delivered to the
Commission prior to the end of the notice period. If no challenge
is made, the revision will take effect without further action. If the
revision is challenged, the revision may not take effect without the
approval of the Commission.
N. No Participating State’s rulemaking requirements shall
apply under this Compact.
-
*AB143*

– 22 –
SECTION 10. OVERSIGHT, DISPUTE RESOLUTION, AND
ENFORCEMENT

A. Oversight
1. The executive and judicial branches of State government
in each Participating State shall enforce this Compact and take all
actions necessary and appropriate to implement the Compact.
2. Venue is proper and judicial proceedings by or against
the Commission shall be brought solely and exclusively in a court
of competent jurisdiction where the principal office of the
Commission is located. The Commission may waive venue and
jurisdictional defenses to the extent it adopts or consents to
participate in alternative dispute resolution proceedings. Nothing
herein shall affect or limit the selection or propriety of venue in
any action against a Licensee for professional malpractice,
misconduct or any such similar matter.
3. The Commission shall be entitled to receive service of
process in any proceeding regarding the enforcement or
interpretation of the Compact or Commission Rule and shall have
standing to intervene in such a proceeding for all purposes.
Failure to provide the Commission service of process shall render
a judgment or order void as to the Commission, this Compact, or
promulgated Rules.
B. Default, Technical Assistance, and Termination
1. If the Commission determines that a Participating State
has defaulted in the performance of its obligations or
responsibilities under this Compact or the promulgated Rules, the
Commission shall provide written notice to the defaulting State.
The notice of default shall describe the default, the proposed
means of curing the default, and any other action that the
Commission may take, and shall offer training and specific
technical assistance regarding the default.
2. The Commission shall provide a copy of the notice of
default to the other Participating States.
C. If a State in default fails to cure the default, the defaulting
State may be terminated from the Compact upon an affirmative
vote of a majority of the Commissioners, and all rights, privileges
and benefits conferred on that State by this Compact may be
terminated on the effective date of termination. A cure of the
default does not relieve the offending State of obligations or
liabilities incurred during the period of default.
D. Termination of participation in the Compact shall be
imposed only after all other means of securing compliance have
been exhausted. Notice of intent to suspend or terminate shall be
given by the Commission to the governor, the majority and
-
*AB143*

– 23 –
minority leaders of the defaulting State’s legislature, the
defaulting State’s State Licensing Authority or Authorities, as
applicable, and each of the Participating States’ State Licensing
Authority or Authorities, as applicable.
E. A State that has been terminated is responsible for all
assessments, obligations, and liabilities incurred through the
effective date of termination, including obligations that extend
beyond the effective date of termination.
F. Upon the termination of a State’s participation in this
Compact, that State shall immediately provide notice to all
Licensees of the State, including Licensees of other Participating
States issued a Compact Privilege to practice within that State, of
such termination. The terminated State shall continue to recognize
all Compact Privileges then in effect in that State for a minimum
of one hundred eighty (180) days after the date of said notice of
termination.
G. The Commission shall not bear any costs related to a State
that is found to be in default or that has been terminated from the
Compact, unless agreed upon in writing between the Commission
and the defaulting State.
H. The defaulting State may appeal the action of the
Commission by petitioning the U.S. District Court for the District
of Columbia or the federal district where the Commission has its
principal offices. The prevailing party shall be awarded all costs of
such litigation, including reasonable attorney’s fees.
I. Dispute Resolution
1. Upon request by a Participating State, the Commission
shall attempt to resolve disputes related to the Compact that arise
among Participating States and between Participating States and
non-Participating States.
2. The Commission shall promulgate a Rule providing for
both mediation and binding dispute resolution for disputes as
appropriate.
J. Enforcement
1. The Commission, in the reasonable exercise of its
discretion, shall enforce the provisions of this Compact and the
Commission’s Rules.
2. By majority vote, the Commission may initiate legal
action against a Participating State in default in the United States
District Court for the District of Columbia or the federal district
where the Commission has its principal offices to enforce
compliance with the provisions of the Compact and its
promulgated Rules. The relief sought may include both injunctive
relief and damages. In the event judicial enforcement is necessary,
the prevailing party shall be awarded all costs of such litigation,
-
*AB143*

– 24 –
including reasonable attorney’s fees. The remedies herein shall
not be the exclusive remedies of the Commission. The Commission
may pursue any other remedies available under federal or the
defaulting Participating State’s law.
3. A Participating State may initiate legal action against the
Commission in the U.S. District Court for the District of Columbia
or the federal district where the Commission has its principal
offices to enforce compliance with the provisions of the Compact
and its promulgated Rules. The relief sought may include both
injunctive relief and damages. In the event judicial enforcement is
necessary, the prevailing party shall be awarded all costs of such
litigation, including reasonable attorney’s fees.
4. No individual or entity other than a Participating State
may enforce this Compact against the Commission.

SECTION 11. EFFECTIVE DATE, WITHDRAWAL, AND
AMENDMENT

A. The Compact shall come into effect on the date on which
the Compact statute is enacted into law in the seventh
Participating State.
1. On or after the effective date of the Compact, the
Commission shall convene and review the enactment of each of
the States that enacted the Compact prior to the Commission
convening (“Charter Participating States”) to determine if the
statute enacted by each such Charter Participating State is
materially different than the Model Compact.
a. A Charter Participating State whose enactment is
found to be materially different from the Model Compact shall be
entitled to the default process set forth in Section 10.
b. If any Participating State is later found to be in
default, or is terminated or withdraws from the Compact, the
Commission shall remain in existence and the Compact shall
remain in effect even if the number of Participating States should
be less than seven (7).
2. Participating States enacting the Compact subsequent to
the Charter Participating States shall be subject to the process set
forth in Section 7.C.23 to determine if their enactments are
materially different from the Model Compact and whether they
qualify for participation in the Compact.
3. All actions taken for the benefit of the Commission or in
furtherance of the purposes of the administration of the Compact
prior to the effective date of the Compact or the Commission
coming into existence shall be considered to be actions of the
Commission unless specifically repudiated by the Commission.
-
*AB143*

– 25 –
4. Any State that joins the Compact subsequent to the
Commission’s initial adoption of the Rules and bylaws shall be
subject to the Commission’s Rules and bylaws as they exist on the
date on which the Compact becomes law in that State. Any Rule
that has been previously adopted by the Commission shall have the
full force and effect of law on the day the Compact becomes law in
that State.
B. Any Participating State may withdraw from this Compact
by enacting a statute repealing that State’s enactment of the
Compact.
1. A Participating State’s withdrawal shall not take effect
until one hundred eighty (180) days after enactment of the
repealing statute.
2. Withdrawal shall not affect the continuing requirement
of the withdrawing State’s Licensing Authority or Authorities to
comply with the investigative and Adverse Action reporting
requirements of this Compact prior to the effective date of
withdrawal.
3. Upon the enactment of a statute withdrawing from this
Compact, the State shall immediately provide notice of such
withdrawal to all Licensees within that State. Notwithstanding any
subsequent statutory enactment to the contrary, such withdrawing
State shall continue to recognize all Compact Privileges to practice
within that State granted pursuant to this Compact for a minimum
of one hundred eighty (180) days after the date of such notice of
withdrawal.
C. Nothing contained in this Compact shall be construed to
invalidate or prevent any licensure agreement or other cooperative
arrangement between a Participating State and a non-
Participating State that does not conflict with the provisions of this
Compact.
D. This Compact may be amended by the Participating States.
No amendment to this Compact shall become effective and
binding upon any Participating State until it is enacted into the
laws of all Participating States.

SECTION 12. CONSTRUCTION AND SEVERABILITY

A. This Compact and the Commission’s rulemaking authority
shall be liberally construed so as to effectuate the purposes, and
the implementation and administration of the Compact. Provisions
of the Compact expressly authorizing or requiring the
promulgation of Rules shall not be construed to limit the
Commission’s rulemaking authority solely for those purposes.
-
*AB143*

– 26 –
B. The provisions of this Compact shall be severable and if
any phrase, clause, sentence or provision of this Compact is held
by a court of competent jurisdiction to be contrary to the
constitution of any Participating State, a State seeking
participation in the Compact, or of the United States, or the
applicability thereof to any government, agency, person or
circumstance is held to be unconstitutional by a court of
competent jurisdiction, the validity of the remainder of this
Compact and the applicability thereof to any other government,
agency, person or circumstance shall not be affected thereby.
C. Notwithstanding subsection B of this section, the
Commission may deny a State’s participation in the Compact or,
in accordance with the requirements of Section 10.B, terminate a
Participating State’s participation in the Compact, if it determines
that a constitutional requirement of a Participating State is a
material departure from the Compact. Otherwise, if this Compact
shall be held to be contrary to the constitution of any Participating
State, the Compact shall remain in full force and effect as to the
remaining Participating States and in full force and effect as to
the Participating State affected as to all severable matters.

SECTION 13. CONSISTENT EFFECT AND CONFLICT WITH
OTHER STATE LAWS

A. Nothing herein shall prevent or inhibit the enforcement of
any other law of a Participating State that is not inconsistent with
the Compact.
B. Any laws, statutes, regulations, or other legal requirements
in a Participating State in conflict with the Compact are
superseded to the extent of the conflict.
C. All permissible agreements between the Commission and
the Participating States are binding in accordance with their
terms.
Sec. 2. NRS 631.368 is hereby amended to read as follows:
631.368 1. Except as otherwise provided in this section , and
NRS 239.0115, and section 1 of this act, any records or information
obtained during the course of an investigation by the Board or a
review panel appointed pursuant to NRS 631.3635 and any record of
the investigation or review are confidential.
2. The complaint or other document filed by the Board to
initiate disciplinary action and all documents and information
considered by the Board when determining whether to impose
discipline are public records.
3. The Board shall, to the extent feasible, communicate or
cooperate with or provide any record or information described in
-
*AB143*

– 27 –
subsection 1 to any other licensing board or any other agency that is
investigating a person, including a law enforcement agency.
Sec. 3. The preliminary chapter of NRS is hereby amended by
adding thereto a new section to read as follows:
Except as otherwise expressly provided in a particular statute
or required by the context, privilege to practice as a dentist or
dental hygienist in this State under the Dentist and Dental
Hygienist Compact ratified and entered into in section 1 of this act
shall be deemed to be equivalent to the corresponding license.
Sec. 4. NRS 239.010 is hereby amended to read as follows:
239.010 1. Except as otherwise provided in this section and
NRS 1.4683, 1.4687, 1A.110, 3.2203, 41.0397, 41.071, 49.095,
49.293, 62D.420, 62D.440, 62E.516, 62E.620, 62H.025, 62H.030,
62H.170, 62H.220, 62H.320, 75A.100, 75A.150, 76.160, 78.152,
80.113, 81.850, 82.183, 86.246, 86.54615, 87.515, 87.5413,
87A.200, 87A.580, 87A.640, 88.3355, 88.5927, 88.6067, 88A.345,
88A.7345, 89.045, 89.251, 90.730, 91.160, 116.757, 116A.270,
116B.880, 118B.026, 119.260, 119.265, 119.267, 119.280,
119A.280, 119A.653, 119A.677, 119B.370, 119B.382, 120A.640,
120A.690, 125.130, 125B.140, 126.141, 126.161, 126.163, 126.730,
127.007, 127.057, 127.130, 127.140, 127.2817, 128.090, 130.312,
130.712, 136.050, 159.044, 159A.044, 164.041, 172.075, 172.245,
176.01334, 176.01385, 176.015, 176.0625, 176.09129, 176.156,
176A.630, 178.39801, 178.4715, 178.5691, 178.5717, 179.495,
179A.070, 179A.165, 179D.160, 180.600, 200.3771, 200.3772,
200.5095, 200.604, 202.3662, 205.4651, 209.392, 209.3923,
209.3925, 209.419, 209.429, 209.521, 211A.140, 213.010, 213.040,
213.095, 213.131, 217.105, 217.110, 217.464, 217.475, 218A.350,
218E.625, 218F.150, 218G.130, 218G.240, 218G.350, 218G.615,
224.240, 226.462, 226.796, 228.270, 228.450, 228.495, 228.570,
231.069, 231.1285, 231.1473, 232.1369, 233.190, 237.300,
239.0105, 239.0113, 239.014, 239B.026, 239B.030, 239B.040,
239B.050, 239C.140, 239C.210, 239C.230, 239C.250, 239C.270,
239C.420, 240.007, 241.020, 241.030, 241.039, 242.105, 244.264,
244.335, 247.540, 247.545, 247.550, 247.560, 250.087, 250.130,
250.140, 250.145, 250.150, 268.095, 268.0978, 268.490, 268.910,
269.174, 271A.105, 281.195, 281.805, 281A.350, 281A.680,
281A.685, 281A.750, 281A.755, 281A.780, 284.4068, 284.4086,
286.110, 286.118, 287.0438, 289.025, 289.080, 289.387, 289.830,
293.4855, 293.5002, 293.503, 293.504, 293.558, 293.5757, 293.870,
293.906, 293.908, 293.909, 293.910, 293B.135, 293D.510, 331.110,
332.061, 332.351, 333.333, 333.335, 338.070, 338.1379, 338.1593,
338.1725, 338.1727, 348.420, 349.597, 349.775, 353.205,
353A.049, 353A.085, 353A.100, 353C.240, 353D.250, 360.240,
360.247, 360.255, 360.755, 361.044, 361.2242, 361.610, 365.138,
-
*AB143*

– 28 –
366.160, 368A.180, 370.257, 370.327, 372A.080, 378.290, 378.300,
379.0075, 379.008, 379.1495, 385A.830, 385B.100, 387.626,
387.631, 388.1455, 388.259, 388.501, 388.503, 388.513, 388.750,
388A.247, 388A.249, 391.033, 391.035, 391.0365, 391.120,
391.925, 392.029, 392.147, 392.264, 392.271, 392.315, 392.317,
392.325, 392.327, 392.335, 392.850, 393.045, 394.167, 394.16975,
394.1698, 394.447, 394.460, 394.465, 396.1415, 396.1425, 396.143,
396.159, 396.3295, 396.405, 396.525, 396.535, 396.9685,
398A.115, 408.3885, 408.3886, 408.3888, 408.5484, 412.153,
414.280, 416.070, 422.2749, 422.305, 422A.342, 422A.350,
425.400, 427A.1236, 427A.872, 427A.940, 432.028, 432.205,
432B.175, 432B.280, 432B.290, 432B.4018, 432B.407, 432B.430,
432B.560, 432B.5902, 432C.140, 432C.150, 433.534, 433A.360,
439.4941, 439.4988, 439.5282, 439.840, 439.914, 439A.116,
439A.124, 439B.420, 439B.754, 439B.760, 439B.845, 440.170,
441A.195, 441A.220, 441A.230, 442.330, 442.395, 442.735,
442.774, 445A.665, 445B.570, 445B.7773, 449.209, 449.245,
449.4315, 449A.112, 450.140, 450B.188, 450B.805, 453.164,
453.720, 458.055, 458.280, 459.050, 459.3866, 459.555, 459.7056,
459.846, 463.120, 463.15993, 463.240, 463.3403, 463.3407,
463.790, 467.1005, 480.535, 480.545, 480.935, 480.940, 481.063,
481.091, 481.093, 482.170, 482.368, 482.5536, 483.340, 483.363,
483.575, 483.659, 483.800, 484A.469, 484B.830, 484B.833,
484E.070, 485.316, 501.344, 503.452, 522.040, 534A.031, 561.285,
571.160, 584.655, 587.877, 598.0964, 598.098, 598A.110,
598A.420, 599B.090, 603.070, 603A.210, 604A.303, 604A.710,
604D.500, 604D.600, 612.265, 616B.012, 616B.015, 616B.315,
616B.350, 618.341, 618.425, 622.238, 622.310, 623.131, 623A.137,
624.110, 624.265, 624.327, 625.425, 625A.185, 628.418, 628B.230,
628B.760, 629.043, 629.047, 629.069, 630.133, 630.2671,
630.2672, 630.2673, 630.2687, 630.30665, 630.336, 630A.327,
630A.555, 631.332, 631.368, 632.121, 632.125, 632.3415,
632.3423, 632.405, 633.283, 633.301, 633.427, 633.4715, 633.4716,
633.4717, 633.524, 634.055, 634.1303, 634.214, 634A.169,
634A.185, 634B.730, 635.111, 635.158, 636.262, 636.342, 637.085,
637.145, 637B.192, 637B.288, 638.087, 638.089, 639.183,
639.2485, 639.570, 640.075, 640.152, 640A.185, 640A.220,
640B.405, 640B.730, 640C.580, 640C.600, 640C.620, 640C.745,
640C.760, 640D.135, 640D.190, 640E.225, 640E.340, 641.090,
641.221, 641.2215, 641A.191, 641A.217, 641A.262, 641B.170,
641B.281, 641B.282, 641C.455, 641C.760, 641D.260, 641D.320,
642.524, 643.189, 644A.870, 645.180, 645.625, 645A.050,
645A.082, 645B.060, 645B.092, 645C.220, 645C.225, 645D.130,
645D.135, 645G.510, 645H.320, 645H.330, 647.0945, 647.0947,
648.033, 648.197, 649.065, 649.067, 652.126, 652.228, 653.900,
-
*AB143*

– 29 –
654.110, 656.105, 657A.510, 661.115, 665.130, 665.133, 669.275,
669.285, 669A.310, 670B.680, 671.365, 671.415, 673.450, 673.480,
675.380, 676A.340, 676A.370, 677.243, 678A.470, 678C.710,
678C.800, 679B.122, 679B.124, 679B.152, 679B.159, 679B.190,
679B.285, 679B.690, 680A.270, 681A.440, 681B.260, 681B.410,
681B.540, 683A.0873, 685A.077, 686A.289, 686B.170, 686C.306,
687A.060, 687A.115, 687B.404, 687C.010, 688C.230, 688C.480,
688C.490, 689A.696, 692A.117, 692C.190, 692C.3507, 692C.3536,
692C.3538, 692C.354, 692C.420, 693A.480, 693A.615, 696B.550,
696C.120, 703.196, 704B.325, 706.1725, 706A.230, 710.159,
711.600, and section 1 of this act, sections 35, 38 and 41 of chapter
478, Statutes of Nevada 2011 and section 2 of chapter 391, Statutes
of Nevada 2013 and unless otherwise declared by law to be
confidential, all public books and public records of a governmental
entity must be open at all times during office hours to inspection by
any person, and may be fully copied or an abstract or memorandum
may be prepared from those public books and public records. Any
such copies, abstracts or memoranda may be used to supply the
general public with copies, abstracts or memoranda of the records or
may be used in any other way to the advantage of the governmental
entity or of the general public. This section does not supersede or in
any manner affect the federal laws governing copyrights or enlarge,
diminish or affect in any other manner the rights of a person in any
written book or record which is copyrighted pursuant to federal law.
2. A governmental entity may not reject a book or record
which is copyrighted solely because it is copyrighted.
3. A governmental entity that has legal custody or control of a
public book or record shall not deny a request made pursuant to
subsection 1 to inspect or copy or receive a copy of a public book or
record on the basis that the requested public book or record contains
information that is confidential if the governmental entity can
redact, delete, conceal or separate, including, without limitation,
electronically, the confidential information from the information
included in the public book or record that is not otherwise
confidential.
4. If requested, a governmental entity shall provide a copy of a
public record in an electronic format by means of an electronic
medium. Nothing in this subsection requires a governmental entity
to provide a copy of a public record in an electronic format or by
means of an electronic medium if:
(a) The public record:
(1) Was not created or prepared in an electronic format; and
(2) Is not available in an electronic format; or
(b) Providing the public record in an electronic format or by
means of an electronic medium would:
-
*AB143*

– 30 –
(1) Give access to proprietary software; or
(2) Require the production of information that is confidential
and that cannot be redacted, deleted, concealed or separated from
information that is not otherwise confidential.
5. An officer, employee or agent of a governmental entity who
has legal custody or control of a public record:
(a) Shall not refuse to provide a copy of that public record in the
medium that is requested because the officer, employee or agent has
already prepared or would prefer to provide the copy in a different
medium.
(b) Except as otherwise provided in NRS 239.030, shall, upon
request, prepare the copy of the public record and shall not require
the person who has requested the copy to prepare the copy himself
or herself.
H
-
*AB143*